Hawaii statutes.
§371-10 Mediation of labor disputes.
The governor or the governor's designated agent shall promote the voluntary
mediation of disputes between employers and employees, and avoid the necessity
of resorting to lockouts, boycotts, blacklists, strikes, discriminations, and
legal proceedings in the matters of employment. In pursuance of this duty, the
governor or the governor's designated agent may appoint temporary boards of
mediation, consisting of one or more members, provide necessary expenses of
such boards, order reasonable compensation not exceeding $10 a day for each
member engaged in such mediation, prescribe rules of procedure for such boards,
conduct investigations and hearings, and may do all things convenient and
necessary to accomplish the purposes of this paragraph. The governor or the
governor's designated agent may designate the director of labor and industrial
relations to act as mediator.

Whenever a controversy arises between an
employer and the employer's employees which is not settled either in conference
between the representatives of the parties or through mediation in the manner
provided in this section, the controversy may by agreement of the parties be
submitted to arbitration by three persons, one to be selected by the employer,
one to be selected by the employees and the two so selected to select the
third.

Whenever the governor finds that all reasonable
efforts for mediation have been made and failed and that the parties are unable
or refuse to enter into an agreement for arbitration, the governor may appoint
an emergency board of disinterested persons to investigate and report
respecting the controversy. The board shall be composed of such number of
persons as the governor may deem desirable. The compensation of the members of
the board shall be fixed by the governor, which compensation, together with all
necessary traveling and other expenses, shall be provided by the director out
of funds made available to the department of labor and industrial relations.
The board shall be created separately in each instance and it shall investigate
promptly the facts as to the controversy and report thereon, together with its
recommendations, to the governor with all reasonable dispatch and in any event
not later than thirty days from the date of its creation. [L 1939, c 237,
§1(12); RL 1945, §4115; RL 1955, §88-16; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27; HRS
§371-10; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Appointment of conciliator, see §377-3.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next